Massachusetts, session 194th, H3883.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 5 of chapter 115 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by inserting, after the word "made", in line 36, the following words: "; and
provided further that, the effective date of an award of disability compensation to a veteran shall
be the day following the date of the veteran's discharge or release if application therefor is
received within 1 year from such date of discharge or release."
of 1